Hawaii statutes.
CHAPTER
414D

HAWAII NONPROFIT CORPORATIONS ACT

Part I. General Provisions

Section

414D-1 Short title

414D-2 Reservation of power to amend or repeal

414D-3 Filing requirements

414D-4 Forms

414D-5 Filing, service, and copying fees

414D-6 Effective time and date of document

414D-7 Correcting filed document

414D-8 Filing duty of the department director

414D-9 Appeal from the department director's
refusal to file

document

414D-10 Evidentiary effect of copy of filed
document

414D-11 Certificates and certified copies to be
received in

evidence

414D-12 Penalty for signing false document

414D-13 Department director; powers

414D-14 Definitions

414D-15 Notice

414D-16 Private foundations

414D-17 Judicial relief

414D-18 Miscellaneous charges

414D-19 Shares of
stock and dividends prohibited; compensation;

distribution

414D-20 Notice to the
attorney general of commencement of

proceeding

Part II. Organization

414D-31 Incorporators

414D-32 Articles of incorporation

414D-33 Incorporation

414D-34 Liability for preincorporation
transactions

414D-35 Organization of corporation

414D-36 Bylaws

414D-37 Emergency bylaws and powers

Part III. Purposes and Powers

414D-51 Purposes

414D-52 General powers

414D-53 Emergency powers

414D-54 Ultra vires

Part IV. Names

414D-61 Corporate name

414D-62 Reserved name

414D-63 Repealed

414D-64 Administrative order of abatement for
infringement of

corporate name

Part V. Office and Registered Agent

414D-71 Registered agent

414D-72 Designation or change of registered agent

414D-73 Resignation of registered agent

414D-74 Service on corporation

Part VI. Members and Memberships

414D-81 Admission

414D-82 Consideration

414D-83 No requirement of members

414D-84 Differences in rights and obligations of
members

414D-85 Member's liability to third parties

414D-86 Member's liability for dues, assessments,
and fees

414D-87 Creditor's action against member

414D-88 Repealed

414D-89 Termination, expulsion, and suspension

414D-89.5 Amendment
terminating or canceling members; redemption

of membership

414D-90 Derivative suits

414D-91 Delegates

Part VII. Members' Meetings, and Voting

414D-101 Annual and regular meetings

414D-102 Special meetings

414D-103 Court-ordered meetings

414D-104 Action by written consent

414D-104.5 Action by ballot

414D-105 Notice of meeting

414D-106 Waiver of notice

414D-107 Record date; determining members entitled

to notice and vote

414D-108 Repealed

414D-109 Members' list for meeting

414D-110 Voting entitlement generally

414D-111 Quorum requirements

414D-112 Voting requirements

414D-113 Proxies

414D-114 Cumulative voting for directors

414D-115 Other methods of electing directors

414D-116 Corporation's acceptance of votes

414D-117 Voting agreements

Part VIII. Directors and Officers

414D-131 Requirement for and duties of the board

414D-132 Qualifications of directors

414D-133 Number of directors

414D-134 Election, designation, and appointment of
directors

414D-135 Terms of directors generally

414D-136 Staggered terms for directors

414D-137 Resignation of directors

414D-138 Removal of directors elected by members
or directors

414D-139 Removal of designated or appointed
directors

414D-140 Removal of directors by judicial
proceeding

414D-141 Vacancy on board

414D-142 Compensation of directors

414D-143 Regular and special meetings

414D-144 Action without meeting

414D-145 Call and notice of meetings

414D-146 Waiver of notice of meeting

414D-147 Quorum and voting

414D-148 Committees of the board

414D-149 General standards for directors

414D-150 Director conflict of interest

414D-151 Loans to or guaranties for directors and
officers

414D-152 Liability for unlawful distributions

414D-153 Required officers

414D-154 Duties and authority of officers

414D-155 Standards of conduct for officers

414D-156 Resignation and removal of officers

414D-157 Contract rights of officers

414D-158 Officers' authority to execute documents

414D-159 Definitions

414D-160 Authority to indemnify

414D-161 Mandatory indemnification

414D-162 Advance for expenses

414D-163 Court-ordered indemnification

414D-164 Determination and authorization of
indemnification

414D-165 Indemnification of officers, employees,
and agents

414D-166 Insurance

414D-167 Application of this part

Part IX.
Amendment of Articles of Incorporation and Bylaws

414D-181 Authority to amend

414D-182 Procedure to amend articles of
incorporation

414D-183 Articles of amendment

414D-184 Restated, amended and restated, articles
of

incorporation

414D-185 Amendment pursuant to judicial
reorganization

414D-186 Effect of amendment and restatement

414D-187 Bylaws

414D-188 Approval by third persons

Part X. Merger

414D-200 Definitions

414D-201 Merger

414D-201.5 Foreign mergers

414D-202 Action on plan by board, members, and
third persons

414D-203 Articles of merger

414D-204 Effect of merger

414D-205 Repealed

414D-206 Bequests, devises, and gifts

414D-207, 208 Repealed

414D-209 Repealed

414D-210 Repealed

414D-211 Limitations on merger by public benefit
corporations

Part XI. Sale of Assets

414D-221 Sale of assets in regular course of
activities and

mortgage of assets

414D-222 Sale of assets other than in regular
course of

activities

Part XII. Distributions

414D-231 Prohibited distributions

414D-232 Authorized distributions

414D-233 Notice to the attorney general of
intention to

dissolve

Part XIII. Dissolution

414D-241 Dissolution by incorporators, initial
directors,

and third persons

414D-242 Dissolution by directors, members, and
third persons

414D-243 Articles of dissolution

414D-244 Revocation of dissolution

414D-245 Effect of dissolution

414D-245.5 Trustees or receivers for dissolved
corporations;

appointment; powers; duties

414D-246 Known claims against dissolved
corporation

414D-247 Unknown claims against dissolved
corporation

414D-248 Grounds for administrative dissolution

414D-249 Procedure for and effect of
administrative

dissolution and effect of expiration

414D-250 Reinstatement following administrative
dissolution

414D-251 Appeal from denial of reinstatement

414D-252 Grounds for judicial dissolution

414D-253 Procedure for judicial dissolution

414D-254 Receivership or custodianship

414D-255 Decree of dissolution

414D-256 Deposit with director of finance

Part XIV. Foreign Corporations

414D-271 Authority to transact business required

414D-272 Consequences of transacting business
without

authority

414D-273 Application for certificate of authority

414D-274 Change of name by foreign corporation

414D-275 Effect of certificate of authority

414D-276 Corporate name of foreign corporation

414D-277 Registered agent of foreign corporation

414D-278 Change of registered agent of foreign
corporation

414D-279 Resignation of registered agent of
foreign

corporation

414D-280 Service on foreign corporation

414D-281 Application to corporations heretofore
authorized to

transact business in this State

414D-282 Withdrawal of foreign corporation

414D-283 Grounds for revocation of certificate of
authority

414D-284 Procedure and effect of revocation

414D-285 Appeal from revocation

Part XV. Records and Reports

414D-301 Corporate records

414D-302 Inspection of records by members

414D-303 Scope of inspection rights

414D-304 Court-ordered inspection

414D-305 Limitations on use of membership list

414D-306 Financial statements for members

414D-306.5 Inspection of records by directors

414D-307 Report of indemnification to members

414D-308 Annual report

Part XVI. Superseding Chapters

414D-311 Superseding chapters

Part XVII. Transition Provisions

414D-321 Application to existing domestic
corporations

414D-322 Application to qualified foreign
corporations

414D-323 Saving provisions

414D-324 Severability

Cross References

Protection of charitable assets; attorney general's
authority, see §28-5.2.

Case Notes

Where church was not a hierarchical church, but a
congregational church that made decisions by a vote of its members as set forth
in its "petition for charter" of incorporation and bylaws, the church
was governed by this chapter; thus, appellants should have been allowed to
amend their complaint, had standing to contest their expulsion, and were not
precluded from doing so by the ecclesiastical abstention doctrine; also,
doctrine did not bar appellants' complaint to the extent it did not require
resolution of controversies over church doctrine, law, or polity. 118 H. 165
(App.), 185 P.3d 913 (2008).

Previous
Vol08_Ch0401-0429
Next